Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1003
Board; dead human bodies; distribution.

The State Anatomical Board, or its duly authorized officers or agents, may take and receive dead bodies as provided in section 71-4834. The board shall distribute the bodies among the medical, chiropractic, osteopathic, and dental schools and colleges, and physicians and surgeons designated by the board, under such rules and regulations as may be adopted and promulgated by it. The number of bodies so distributed to such schools and colleges shall be in proportion to the number of students matriculated in the first-year work of such schools and colleges. If there are more bodies than are required by such schools and colleges, the board, or its duly authorized officers, may, from time to time, designate physicians and surgeons to receive such bodies, and the number of bodies they may receive, if such physicians and surgeons have complied with all rules and regulations which the board may adopt and promulgate for such disposition. All expenses incurred by the board in receiving, caring for, and delivering any such body shall be paid by those receiving such body.

Laws 1929, c. 158, § 3, p. 552;

C.S.1929, § 71-2803;

R.S.1943, § 71-1003;

Laws 1971, LB 268, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB559, § 2.

Board of Funeral Directing and Embalming, distribution to and use by, see section 38-1417.